Utah statutes.
78A-2-309.   Liability for fees if successful in litigation.
Nothing in this part shall prevent a justice court judge, clerk, constable, or
sheriff from collecting his or her regular fees for all services rendered for
the impecunious person, in the event the person is successful in litigation.
All fees and costs shall be regularly taxed and included in any judgment
recovered by the person.  The fees and costs shall be paid to a justice court
judge, clerk, constable, or sheriff.   If the person fails in the action or
appeal, then the costs of the action or appeal shall be adjudged against the
person.
